test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-4lex_kunagas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - kunâgâs: # MLO, ok
    kunâgâs+N+Sg+Nom: kunâgâs
    kunâgâs+N+Sg+Gen: kunâgâs
    kunâgâs+N+Sg+Acc: kunâgâs
    kunâgâs+N+Sg+Ill: kunâgâsân
    kunâgâs+N+Sg+Loc: kunâgâsâst
    kunâgâs+N+Sg+Com: kunâgâssáin
    kunâgâs+N+Sg+Abe: kunâgâsttáá
    kunâgâs+N+Ess: kunâgâssân
    kunâgâs+N+Par: kunâgâssâd
    kunâgâs+N+Pl+Nom: kunâgâsah
    kunâgâs+N+Pl+Gen: kunâgâsâi
    kunâgâs+N+Pl+Acc: kunâgâsâid
    kunâgâs+N+Pl+Ill: kunâgâssáid
    kunâgâs+N+Pl+Loc: kunâgâsâin
    kunâgâs+N+Pl+Com: [kunâgâsâiguin, kunâgâsâigijn]
    kunâgâs+N+Pl+Abe: kunâgâsâittáá
    
  Noun - káránâs: # MLO, ok
    káránâs+N+Sg+Nom: káránâs
    káránâs+N+Sg+Gen: káránâs
    káránâs+N+Sg+Acc: káránâs
    káránâs+N+Sg+Ill: káránâsân
    káránâs+N+Sg+Loc: káránâsâst
    káránâs+N+Sg+Com: káránâssáin
    káránâs+N+Sg+Abe: káránâsttáá
    káránâs+N+Ess: káránâssân
    káránâs+N+Par: káránâssâd
    káránâs+N+Pl+Nom: káránâsah
    káránâs+N+Pl+Gen: káránâsâi
    káránâs+N+Pl+Acc: káránâsâid
    káránâs+N+Pl+Ill: káránâssáid
    káránâs+N+Pl+Loc: káránâsâin
    káránâs+N+Pl+Com: [káránâsâiguin, káránâsâigijn]
    káránâs+N+Pl+Abe: káránâsâittáá

  Noun - siäpulâs: # MLO, ok
    siäpulâs+N+Sg+Nom: siäpulâs
    siäpulâs+N+Sg+Gen: siäpulâs
    siäpulâs+N+Sg+Acc: siäpulâs
    siäpulâs+N+Sg+Ill: siäpulâsân
    siäpulâs+N+Sg+Loc: siäpulâsâst
    siäpulâs+N+Sg+Com: siäpulâssáin
    siäpulâs+N+Sg+Abe: siäpulâsttáá
    siäpulâs+N+Ess: siäpulâssân
    siäpulâs+N+Par: siäpulâssâd
    siäpulâs+N+Pl+Nom: siäpulâsah
    siäpulâs+N+Pl+Gen: siäpulâsâi
    siäpulâs+N+Pl+Acc: siäpulâsâid
    siäpulâs+N+Pl+Ill: siäpulâssáid
    siäpulâs+N+Pl+Loc: siäpulâsâin
    siäpulâs+N+Pl+Com: [siäpulâsâiguin, siäpulâsâigijn]
    siäpulâs+N+Pl+Abe: siäpulâsâittáá

  Noun - čuojânâs: # MLO, ok
    čuojânâs+N+Sg+Nom: čuojânâs
    čuojânâs+N+Sg+Gen: čuojânâs
    čuojânâs+N+Sg+Acc: čuojânâs
    čuojânâs+N+Sg+Ill: čuojânâsân
    čuojânâs+N+Sg+Loc: čuojânâsâst
    čuojânâs+N+Sg+Com: čuojânâssáin
    čuojânâs+N+Sg+Abe: čuojânâsttáá
    čuojânâs+N+Ess: čuojânâssân
    čuojânâs+N+Par: čuojânâssâd
    čuojânâs+N+Pl+Nom: čuojânâsah
    čuojânâs+N+Pl+Gen: čuojânâsâi
    čuojânâs+N+Pl+Acc: čuojânâsâid
    čuojânâs+N+Pl+Ill: čuojânâssáid
    čuojânâs+N+Pl+Loc: čuojânâsâin
    čuojânâs+N+Pl+Com: [čuojânâsâiguin, čuojânâsâigijn]
    čuojânâs+N+Pl+Abe: čuojânâsâittáá

    
  Noun - komserjâs: # MLO, ok
    komserjâs+N+Sg+Nom: komserjâs
    komserjâs+N+Sg+Gen: komserjâs
    komserjâs+N+Sg+Acc: komserjâs
    komserjâs+N+Sg+Ill: komserjâsân
    komserjâs+N+Sg+Loc: komserjâsâst
    komserjâs+N+Sg+Com: komserjâssáin
    komserjâs+N+Sg+Abe: komserjâsttáá
    komserjâs+N+Ess: komserjâssân
    komserjâs+N+Par: komserjâssâd
    komserjâs+N+Pl+Nom: komserjâsah
    komserjâs+N+Pl+Gen: komserjâsâi
    komserjâs+N+Pl+Acc: komserjâsâid
    komserjâs+N+Pl+Ill: komserjâssáid
    komserjâs+N+Pl+Loc: komserjâsâin
    komserjâs+N+Pl+Com: [komserjâsâiguin, komserjâsâigijn]
    komserjâs+N+Pl+Abe: komserjâsâittáá

  Noun - sopâmuš: # MLO, ok
    sopâmuš+N+Sg+Nom: sopâmuš
    sopâmuš+N+Sg+Gen: sopâmuš
    sopâmuš+N+Sg+Acc: sopâmuš
    sopâmuš+N+Sg+Ill: sopâmušân
    sopâmuš+N+Sg+Loc: sopâmušâst
    sopâmuš+N+Sg+Com: sopâmuššáin
    sopâmuš+N+Sg+Abe: sopâmušttáá
    sopâmuš+N+Ess: sopâmuššân
    sopâmuš+N+Par: sopâmuššâd
    sopâmuš+N+Pl+Nom: sopâmušah
    sopâmuš+N+Pl+Gen: sopâmušâi
    sopâmuš+N+Pl+Acc: sopâmušâid
    sopâmuš+N+Pl+Ill: sopâmuššáid
    sopâmuš+N+Pl+Loc: sopâmušâin
    sopâmuš+N+Pl+Com: [sopâmušâiguin, sopâmušâigijn]
    sopâmuš+N+Pl+Abe: sopâmušâittáá
    
  Noun - purrâmâš: # MLO, ok purrâmuš and purrâmuš are both very common and accepted; dialectological variants
    purrâmâš+v1+N+Sg+Nom: purrâmuš
    purrâmâš+v1+N+Sg+Gen: purrâmuš
    purrâmâš+v1+N+Sg+Acc: purrâmuš
    purrâmâš+v1+N+Sg+Ill: purrâmušân
    purrâmâš+v1+N+Sg+Loc: purrâmušâst
    purrâmâš+v1+N+Sg+Com: purrâmuššáin
    purrâmâš+v1+N+Sg+Abe: purrâmušttáá
    purrâmâš+v1+N+Ess: purrâmuš
    purrâmâš+v1+N+Par: purrâmuššâd
    purrâmâš+v1+N+Pl+Nom: purrâmušah
    purrâmâš+v1+N+Pl+Gen: purrâmušâi
    purrâmâš+v1+N+Pl+Acc: purrâmušâid
    purrâmâš+v1+N+Pl+Ill: purrâmuššáid
    purrâmâš+v1+N+Pl+Loc: purrâmušâin
    purrâmâš+v1+N+Pl+Com: [purrâmušâiguin, purrâmušâigijn]
    purrâmâš+v1+N+Pl+Abe: purrâmušâittáá
    
  Noun - purrâmâš: # MLO, ok purrâmuš and purrâmuš are both very common and accepted; dialectological variants
    purrâmâš+v2+N+Sg+Nom: purrâmâš
    purrâmâš+v2+N+Sg+Gen: purrâmâš
    purrâmâš+v2+N+Sg+Acc: purrâmâš
    purrâmâš+v2+N+Sg+Ill: purrâmâšân
    purrâmâš+v2+N+Sg+Loc: purrâmâšâst
    purrâmâš+v2+N+Sg+Com: purrâmâššáin
    purrâmâš+v2+N+Sg+Abe: purrâmâšttáá
    purrâmâš+v2+N+Ess: purrâmâššân
    purrâmâš+v2+N+Par: purrâmâššâd
    purrâmâš+v2+N+Pl+Nom: purrâmâšah
    purrâmâš+v2+N+Pl+Gen: purrâmâšâi
    purrâmâš+v2+N+Pl+Acc: purrâmâšâid
    purrâmâš+v2+N+Pl+Ill: purrâmâššáid
    purrâmâš+v2+N+Pl+Loc: purrâmâšâin
    purrâmâš+v2+N+Pl+Com: [purrâmâšâiguin, purrâmâšâigijn]
    purrâmâš+v2+N+Pl+Abe: purrâmâšâittáá
    
